Wyoming statutes. Title 14 Children
Article 5. Parent-Child Relationship

§ 14-2-501.
Establishment of parent-child relationship.

The mother-child relationship is established between a woman and a child by:

The woman’s having given birth to the child;

An adjudication of the woman’s maternity; or

Adoption of the child by the woman.

The father-child relationship is established between a man and a child by:

An unrebutted presumption of the man’s paternity of the child under W.S.

14-2-504

;

An effective acknowledgment of paternity by the man under article 6 of this act, unless the acknowledgment has been rescinded or successfully challenged;

An adjudication of the man’s paternity;

Adoption of the child by the man; or

The man’s having consented to assisted reproduction by his wife under article 9 of this act which resulted in the birth of the child.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1; 2017 ch. 172, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in (b)(v) substituted “article 9 of this act” for “article 8 of this act.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-2-402(a)(xxi).

Editor's notes. —

The following annotations are taken from cases decided under prior law.

Not giving biological father same procedure to establish paternity as mother not unconstitutional. —

The failure to give the biological father the same procedure to establish paternity or nonpaternity as is given to the mother does not unconstitutionally deprive the father of due process oflaw nor equal protection of the law by virtue of an impermissible gender-based classification. A v. X, Y, & Z, 641 P.2d 1222,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 307

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 459 U.S. 1021, 103 S. Ct. 388, 74 L. Ed. 2d 518, 1982 U.S. LEXIS 4426 (U.S. 1982); A v. X, 459 U.S. 1021, 103 S. Ct. 388, 74 L. Ed. 2d 518, 1982 U.S. LEXIS 4426 (U.S. 1982).

Statutes permit award to state of child support and other expenses. —

Former provisions were broad enough to permit an award, on the petition of the state, for child support owing the child's mother and other expenses. Holtz v. State, 847 P.2d 972,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1993).

State bound to protect child's right to legitimacy. —

Even in this era of no-fault divorce, frequent premarital sex, cohabitation and new attitudes toward child rearing, a child has a right to legitimacy and that right is one the state is bound to protect during minority. A v. X, Y, & Z, 641 P.2d 1222,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 307

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 459 U.S. 1021, 103 S. Ct. 388, 74 L. Ed. 2d 518, 1982 U.S. LEXIS 4426 (U.S. 1982).

Intestacy. —

Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

2-4-107

is unequivocally one-sided and does not establish mutuality for inheritance purposes because adoptive parents have all relevant rights after an adoption, and the terms “mother” and “father” mean the adoptive parents; therefore, a district court erred by entering judgment in favor of several biological siblings because a niece was the only true heir of a decedent, who, along with the niece’s father, had been adopted. Shippey v. Rogers (In re Estate of Kirkpatrick), 2003 WY 125, 77 P.3d 404,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 2003).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Relationship between victim and plaintiff-witness as affecting right to recover damages in negligence for shock or mental anguish, 94 ALR3d 486.

Marital status of prospective adopting parents as factor in adoption proceedings, 2 ALR4th 555.

Initial award or denial of child custody to homosexual or lesbian parent, 62 ALR5th 591.

Stepparent's postdivorce duty to support stepchild, 44 ALR4th 520.

Parental rights of man who is not biological or adoptive father of child but was husband or cohabitant of mother when child was conceived or born, 84 ALR4th 655.

Custodial parent's homosexual or lesbian relationship with third person as justifying modification of child custody order, 65 ALR5th 591.

§ 14-2-502.
No discrimination based on marital status.

A child born to parents who are not married to each other has the same rights under the law as a child born to parents who are married to each other.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

§ 14-2-503.
Consequences of establishment of parentage.

Unless parental rights are terminated, a parent-child relationship established under this act applies for all purposes, except as otherwise specifically provided by other law of this state.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-2-402(a)(xxi).

§ 14-2-504.
Presumption of paternity in context of marriage.

A man is presumed to be the father of a child if:

He and the mother of the child are married to each other and the child is born during the marriage;

He and the mother of the child were married to each other and the child is born within three hundred (300) days after the marriage is terminated by death, annulment, declaration of invalidity, divorce or after the entry of a decree of separation;

Before the birth of the child, he and the mother of the child married each other in apparent compliance with law, even if the attempted marriage is or could be declared invalid, and the child is born during the invalid marriage or within three hundred (300) days after its termination by death, annulment, declaration of invalidity, divorce or after the entry of a decree of separation;

After the birth of the child, he and the mother of the child married each other in apparent compliance with law, whether or not the marriage is or could be declared invalid, and he voluntarily asserted his paternity of the child, and:

The assertion is in a record filed with the state office of vital records;

He agreed to be and is named as the child’s father on the child’s birth certificate; or

He promised in a record to support the child as his own.

For the first two (2) years of the child’s life, he resided in the same household with the child and openly held out the child as his own.

A presumption of paternity established under this section may be rebutted only by an adjudication under article 8 of this act.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

The following annotations are taken from cases decided under prior law.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-2-402(a)(xxi).

Not giving biological father same procedure to establish paternity as mother not unconstitutional. —

The failure to give the biological father the same procedure to establish paternity or nonpaternity as is given to the mother does not unconstitutionally deprive the father of due process of law nor equal protection of the law by virtue of an impermissible gender-based classification. A v. X, Y, & Z, 641 P.2d 1222,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 307

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 459 U.S. 1021, 103 S. Ct. 388, 74 L. Ed. 2d 518, 1982 U.S. LEXIS 4426 (U.S. 1982).

Presumed father was barred from contesting parentage of children

by his failure to bring his action within a “reasonable time” pursuant to former § 14-2-104(a)(ii) [repealed] and by the doctrines of res judicata, collateral estoppel and judicial estoppel. In re Paternity of JRW, 814 P.2d 1256,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1991).

Where the record demonstrated that the defendant was the presumed father of a child under this section by virtue of the fact that he married the child's natural mother and became obligated to pay child support through a Utah divorce decree, the paternity action was barred by the United States constitution's full faith and credit clause, res judicata, Wyoming precedent and this section's limitations period. Livingston v. Vanderiet, 861 P.2d 549,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1993).

Best interests of the children is standard to resolve paternity dispute. —

Where the mother's husband asserted paternity under the marital presumption provided in former Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 14-2-102(a)(i), now § 14-2-504(a)(i), and the mother's boyfriend asserted paternity under the holding out presumption of former § 14-2-102(a)(iv), now § 14-2-504(a)(v), the trial court was required to consider the best interests of the children and look to the presumption based on the weightier considerations of policy and logic as provided in former Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 14-2-102(b), now § 14-2-504(b). The trial court's decision finding that the boyfriend was the father of the children was supported by the record and simply confirmed and gave legal effect to a relationship that existed throughout the children's lives and did not impermissibly interfere with any rights the husband might have had stemming from his marriage to the children's mother. GDK v. State, 2004 WY 78, 92 P.3d 834,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(Wyo. 2004).

Presumption rebutted. —

Putative father
was not a child's presumptive parent, under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 14-2-504(a)(v), because the putative father stipulated to the accuracy
and admissibility of a paternity test conclusively proving the putative
father could not be the biological father, rebutting any presumption
beyond any doubt. LP v. LF, 2014 WY 152, 338 P.3d 908,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 2014).

Action to declare nonexistence of presumptive father/child relationship time barred. —

Biological mother's action to declare the nonexistence of a presumptive father and child relationship, where the issue was not contested until almost four years after all of the relevant facts were known, was time barred under the statute that requires the action to be brought within a reasonable time. In re Adoption of R.S.C., 837 P.2d 1089,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 1992).

Where no timely action has been instituted within five years of a child's birth to declare the nonexistence of a father and child relationship, the statutory presumption of paternity becomes absolute, and any action to establish another's paternity is foreclosed. JA v. CJH, 923 P.2d 758,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 1996).

Presumption arising from marriage controls. —

The presumption of paternity found in former § 14-2-102(a)(i) controlled over the presumption in former § 14-2-102(a)(iv). This state has made a policy choice in favor of legitimacy. That choice is based on social considerations of the family unit and the child, which go beyond the marriage itself. LC v. TL, 870 P.2d 374,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 513 U.S. 871, 115 S. Ct. 195, 130 L. Ed. 2d 127, 1994 U.S. LEXIS 6327 (U.S. 1994).

The proper construction of former § 14-2-102(c), when read in accord with the related paternity statute, §

35-1-411

, is that the mother cannot file an affidavit of paternity if she was married either at the time of conception or the time of birth of the child. Department of Family Servs., Div. of Public Assistance & Social Servs. v. PAJ, 934 P.2d 1257,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 1997).

Conflicting presumptions. —

Presumptive father failed to provide clear and convincing evidence to meet his burden of proving that results of genetic test favoring another man were inaccurate or somehow deficient. TL v. CS, 975 P.2d 1065,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1999).

Failure to adhere to procedural requirements. —

Although failure to adhere to the procedural requirements of the statutes governing establishment of paternity of a child receiving aid from the department of family services may cause a judgment rendered under those statutes to be void, where the defendant had notice of the hearing, an opportunity to be heard, and was accorded the process due under all the circumstances of his case, the district court did not err in entering default against the defendant, nor did it abuse its discretion in refusing the defendant relief from that default. A.P. v. Department of Health & Human Servs., Div. of Pub. Assistance & Social Servs., 849 P.2d 703,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 1993).

Blood or DNA test not required. —

Nothing in former § 14-2-102(b)'s language dictates that a blood or DNA test is a prerequisite to determining which of two presumptions is “founded on the weightier considerations of policy and logic.” LC v. TL, 870 P.2d 374,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 513 U.S. 871, 115 S. Ct. 195, 130 L. Ed. 2d 127, 1994 U.S. LEXIS 6327 (U.S. 1994).

Where evidence supports finding of paternity. —

Although the court did not make a specific finding that defendant was the father, it did find that the natural mother and presumptive father were separated during the conceptive period and without sexual access, that such access had existed between the mother and defendant, that there was no evidence of sexual access by a third party and that the testimony rebutted the presumption of parentage by the presumptive father. Accordingly, the trial court found the defendant to be the father. Vigil v. Tafoya, 600 P.2d 721,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 457

(Wyo. 1979).

Res judicata barred plaintiff's second action to establish his paternity

and to rebut presumed paternity of mother's husband where involuntary dismissal of first suit for failure to appear was adjudication on the merits and facts, parties, claims and issues raised or that could have been raised were the same; fact that defendants were divorced after first suit did not alter identity of parties nor provide basis for a different claim. CLS v. CLJ, 693 P.2d 774,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 424

(Wyo. 1985).

Action by child not barred by prior action by mother. —

A child who has not been included as a party in any prior paternity case nor any prior divorce action cannot be foreclosed by the doctrines of res judicata, collateral estoppel, or judicial estoppel with respect to the child's subsequent effort to achieve determination of paternity. RKS v. SDM by TY (In re SDM), 882 P.2d 1217,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 1994).

Summary judgment appropriate. —

The court was correct in finding that a father was entitled to the two statutory presumptions as a matter of law, and where the presumptions were unrebutted, he was entitled to summary judgment. KC v. KM (In re IC), 941 P.2d 46,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Recognition of child within statutes affecting status or rights of illegitimates, 33 ALR2d 705.

Proof of husband's impotency or sterility as rebutting presumption of legitimacy, 84 ALR3d 495.

Who may dispute presumption of legitimacy of child conceived or born during wedlock, 90 ALR3d 1032.